Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.001

Finding, purpose.

The legislature finds that *chapter 42.17 RCW contains laws relating to several discrete subjects. Therefore, the purpose of chapter 274, Laws of 2005 is to recodify some of those laws and create a new chapter in the Revised Code of Washington that contains laws pertaining to public records.

[ 2005 c 274 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Provisions in chapter 42.17 RCW relating to public records were recodified in chapter 42.56 RCW by 2005 c 274, effective July 1, 2006. Provisions in chapter 42.17 RCW relating to campaign disclosure and contribution were recodified in chapter 42.17A RCW by 2010 c 204, effective January 1, 2012. Chapter 42.17A RCW was recodified into Title 29B RCW by 2024 c 164, effective January 1, 2026.